Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 83.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 91, O.S.L. 2022 (73 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 83.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 83.1. A. There is hereby re-created to continue until
July 1, 2025 2030, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, a
Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning Commission to exercise
the functions and perform the duties hereinafter prescribed.
B. The Commission shall be composed of eleven (11) members as
follows:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1035 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services or his or her designee, who shall be ex officio chair of
the Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning Commission;
2. The Director of the Transportation Commission or his or her
designee;
3. The President of the University of Oklahoma or his or her
designee;
4. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate;
5. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
6. The Chair of the Planning Commission of Oklahoma City or his
or her designee;
7. The Chair of the Long-Range Capital Planning Commission or
his or her designee; and
8. Two members of the Commission appointed by the Governor,
with the advice and consent of the State Senate, for four-year
staggered terms with one term expiring on January 31 of each even-
numbered year.
C. The Commission is authorized to appoint and hire a Director,
who shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the
Commission, and other necessary personnel. The Attorney General of
the State of Oklahoma shall be the legal advisor to the Commission

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1035 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in t he same capacity as he or she is to other boards and
commissions.
D. At least one of the members appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall be a resident within the boundaries of the
Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning District as set forth
in Section 83 of this title.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ADMINISTRATIVE RULES
April 3, 2025 - DO PASS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1035 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)